New York, session 2025-2026, A7246.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. 1. Definitions. As used in this act: 2 a. "director" means the director of the office of nonprofit develop- 3 ment; 4 b. "nonprofit organization" means an organization described in section 5 501 (C)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and 6 c. "office" means the office of nonprofit development created by this 7 act. 8 2. Office of nonprofit development. The office of nonprofit develop- 9 ment is hereby created within the empire state development corporation 10 to have and exercise the functions, powers and duties provided by the 11 provisions of this act and any other provision of law. 12 3. Director. The head of the office shall be the director of the 13 office. The director shall be appointed by the governor and shall 14 receive a salary to be fixed by the governor within the amounts appro- 15 priated therefor. The director shall report to the commissioner of 16 empire state development. 17 a. The director may, from time to time, create, abolish, transfer and 18 consolidate units within the office not expressly established by law as 19 the director may determine necessary for the efficient operation of the 20 office, subject to the approval of the commissioner of empire state 21 development. 22 b. The director may appoint assistants, and other officers and employ- 23 ees, committees and consultants as the director may deem necessary, 24 prescribe their powers and duties, fix their compensation within the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06861-01-5 A. 7246 2 1 amounts appropriated therefor, subject to the approval of the commis- 2 sioner of empire state development and the director of the budget. 3 c. The director may request and receive from any department, division, 4 board, bureau, commission or other agency of the state any information 5 and non-financial resources that will enable the office to properly 6 carry out its functions, powers and duties. Requests for assistance from 7 such entities shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner of 8 empire state development. 9 4. Functions, powers and duties. The office shall have the following 10 functions, powers and duties: 11 a. to assist nonprofit organizations with business development, capac- 12 ity building and technical support; 13 b. to provide financial education to nonprofit organizations, includ- 14 ing education relating to accounting and reporting requirements, cash 15 flow management, loan and borrowing procedures, and applicable grant and 16 award programs; 17 c. to advise nonprofit organizations about fund-raising measures, 18 techniques and reporting requirements; 19 d. to provide nonprofit organizations with access to mentorship 20 programs, leadership training programs and job development programs, 21 including advice as to the hiring and training of nonprofit staff; and 22 e. to periodically coordinate with the New York State Nonprofit Unit 23 regarding the interpretation and clarification of state regulations. 24 5. Report. On or before September thirtieth of each year, the office 25 shall submit a report to the commissioner of empire state development 26 setting forth the following: 27 a. the number of nonprofit organizations accessing the office's 28 services; 29 b. aggregate information regarding the nature and populations served 30 by nonprofit organizations accessing the office's services; 31 c. aggregate information regarding the types of services provided to 32 nonprofit organizations accessing the office's services; 33 d. aggregate information regarding grant and/or award funding obtained 34 by nonprofit organizations with the assistance of the office; and 35 e. recommendations of the office as to how to better serve nonprofit 36 organizations. 37 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.